Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Tobacco Master Settlement Agreement

248.701.
Definitions for KRS 248.701 to 248.727.

As used in KRS

248.701

to

248.727

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Board” means the Agricultural Development Board created by KRS

248.707

;

“Fund” means the agricultural development fund established in KRS

248.655

as the “Rural Development Fund;”

“Subcommittee” means the Tobacco Settlement Agreement Fund Oversight Committee created by KRS

248.723

;

“Council” means an agricultural development council required by KRS

248.721

;

“Master Settlement Agreement” means the settlement agreement dated November 23, 1998, entered into by the Commonwealth of Kentucky and major United States tobacco product manufacturers; and

“Phase II Agreement” means the National Tobacco Grower Settlement Trust Agreement dated July 19, 1999, entered into by tobacco states and major tobacco companies to compensate tobacco growers and quota owners for losses resulting from the Master Settlement Agreement.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 530, § 1, effective April 26, 2000.

248.703.
Allocation of moneys received in tobacco settlement agreement fund from Master Settlement Agreement.

Fifty percent (50%) of the moneys received in the tobacco settlement agreement fund from Master Settlement Agreement funding after June 30, 2000, along with accrued interest, shall be allocated within twenty (20) days of receipt of the moneys to the agricultural development fund created in KRS

248.655

. The moneys received in the fund, along with the accrued interest, shall be further allocated as follows:

Thirty-five percent (35%) to the counties account; and

Sixty-five percent (65%) for other projects throughout the state.

The allocation within the counties account in the agricultural development fund for each county shall be assured for use in each county and shall be based on the following weighted factors:

Fifty percent (50%) weight to the county’s percentage of the state’s tobacco allotment based on 1999 data;

Twenty-five percent (25%) weight to the county’s number of farms with tobacco quotas in the county as a percentage of farms with tobacco quotas statewide, based on 1999 data; and

Twenty-five percent (25%) weight to the economic impact index for each county which shall be calculated in the following manner:

The tobacco income for each county (1997 burley tobacco production times average burley market price) divided by the total personal income for each county. The data used shall reflect the year most recently available for total personal income.

The percentage derived in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph (tobacco income as a percentage of total personal income for each county) shall then be summed across all counties.

The economic impact index amount shall be each county’s tobacco income as a percentage of total personal income, divided by the aggregate percentage stated in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph.

When a county’s allocation is exhausted, applicants from that county may apply for funds from the other sixty-five percent (65%) of the moneys in the agricultural development fund. Failure by a county to exhaust its county allocation shall not preclude the county from receiving the benefits of a proposal approved by the board from state funds.

Any funds directly appropriated by the General Assembly shall be assessed against the percentage of funds allocated to the state portion of the agricultural development fund.

Interest earned on any moneys in any fund or account created in KRS

248.701

to

248.727

shall accrue to that fund or account until transferred to another fund or account created or referenced in KRS

248.701

to

248.727

.

None of the moneys left at the end of a fiscal year in any fund or account created or referenced in KRS

248.701

to

248.727

shall lapse, but shall stay with the fund or account as long as the fund or account exists, or until the moneys are transferred to another fund or account created or referenced in KRS

248.701

to

248.727

. In the case of any fund or account created in KRS 248.701 to 248.727 that is terminated with a remaining balance, the balance shall remain in the agricultural development fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 530, § 2, effective April 26, 2000; 2005, ch. 173, § 2, effective March 20, 2005.

Official Comments

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 18, (1) at 1643.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 21, (5) at 1645.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 21, (6) at 1646.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, F, 7, (2) at 1669.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. X, (5) at 1759.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. X, E at 1762.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. X, A at 1760.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. X, B at 1760.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. X, C at 1760.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. X, C, 1, (2) at 1760.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. X, C, 1, (3) at 1760.

248.705.
Phase II supplement funds. [Repealed.]

248.707.
Agricultural Development Board.

The Agricultural Development Board is created as a political subdivision of the Commonwealth to perform essential governmental and public functions by administering funds to provide economic assistance to the agriculture community of the Commonwealth. The board shall be a public agency within the meaning of KRS

61.805

,

61.870

, and other applicable statutes.

The board shall consist of sixteen (16) members as follows:

Five (5) voting members or their designees, as follows:

The Commissioner of Agriculture, who shall serve as chairperson. The Commissioner of Agriculture may designate a representative to serve as chairperson in the Commissioner’s absence;

The Governor of the Commonwealth of Kentucky;

The secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development;

The director of the University of Kentucky Cooperative Extension Service; and

The president of Kentucky State University; and

Eleven (11) voting members appointed by the Commissioner, who shall be geographically distributed throughout the state and subject to confirmation as provided in KRS 11.160(2). The members shall be as follows:

Seven (7) active farmers, at least four (4) of whom shall be from counties that are substantially tobacco-impacted, as determined by a formula that includes tobacco income as a percentage of total personal income in the county, and at least two (2) of whom shall have experience in agricultural diversification;

One (1) representative of the Kentucky Farm Bureau;

One (1) representative of the Kentucky Chamber of Commerce, who shall be an agribusiness person;

One (1) attorney with farm experience and familiarity with agricultural policy; and

One (1) agricultural lender.

The members appointed under subsection (2)(b)2. and 3. of this section shall be chosen from a list of three (3) nominees submitted to the Commissioner by each of the respective organizations.

Consideration shall be given to racial and gender equity in the appointment of board members.

The majority of the voting members shall be active farmers.

Members of the board shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

Except as provided in paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection, The terms of the members appointed by the Commissioner shall be for four (4) years and until their successors are appointed and confirmed. A vacancy on the board shall be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment. Members may be reappointed. The initial appointments shall be for staggered terms, as follows:

Two (2) members shall be appointed for one (1) year;

Three (3) members shall be appointed for two (2) years;

Three (3) members shall be appointed for three (3) years; and

Three (3) members shall be appointed for four (4) years.

The board shall meet monthly, or at the call of the chair or a majority of the voting members.

A quorum of the board shall consist of nine (9) voting members. A majority of the voting members present may act upon matters before the board.

The board shall be attached to the Department of Agriculture.

Staff services for the board shall be provided by the Department of Agriculture.

The Agricultural Development Board shall not be subject to reorganization under KRS Chapter 12.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 530, § 4, effective April 26, 2000; 2007, ch. 137, § 182, effective June 26, 2007; 2021 ch. 12, § 8, effective March 12, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(3/12/2021). This statute was amended by Section 8 of 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 12. Section 16 of that Act states, in part: “[I]t is imperative that the continuity of the Agricultural Development Board and the Kentucky Agricultural Finance Corporation remain as established upon the effective date of this Act. Therefore, it is the intent of the General Assembly that each member of the Agricultural Development Board and the Kentucky Agricultural Finance Corporation shall serve his or her term as appointed and shall not be replaced unless by resignation and duly recognized.”

248.709.
Duties of board.

The board’s duties shall include but not be limited to:

Administering the agricultural development fund, except as provided in KRS 248.717(2);

Receiving requests and applications for funds and authorizing the distribution of funds. The board may receive applications from institutions of public postsecondary education for financial and technical assistance in conducting alternative crop development research. The board shall assist the applicants in obtaining any necessary federal permits that may be required to conduct alternative crop research. A recipient institution shall report the status and progress of the alternative crop development research to the board, the Interim Joint Committee on Agriculture, and the Tobacco Settlement Agreement Fund Oversight Committee. The board shall promulgate administrative regulations relating to growing and researching alternative crops at the selected postsecondary institution, and shall adopt any applicable federal regulations;

Developing guidelines and criteria for eligibility for and disbursement of funds, the types of direct and indirect economic assistance to be awarded, and procedures for applying for funds and reviewing applications for assistance;

Ensuring that each county agricultural development council’s plans and county recommendations and applications receive major consideration in decisions on use of a county’s funds;

Completing a comprehensive plan and updating the plan no less than every ten (10) years.

The comprehensive plan shall propose short-term and long-term goals, strategies, and investments in Kentucky agriculture that will assist farmers in remaining competitive in existing and new enterprises. The comprehensive plan shall identify a diversified mix of enterprises that are profitable to farmers and shall determine the investments necessary to support the viability of those enterprises. The plan shall be reviewed by the General Assembly and the subcommittee created in KRS

248.723

. The subcommittee may issue comment on the plan. However, the board may act without General Assembly approval.

Notwithstanding the provisions of 2000 Ky. Acts ch. 546, immediate funding needs may be addressed and funded before a comprehensive or strategic plan is completed. Proposals from an applicant may be approved by the board if they meet the criteria established in KRS

248.713

;

Preparing a biennial budget request in accordance with KRS Chapter 48;

Working with other governmental agencies to maximize the financial and economic impact that the programs implemented by the board will have and to maximize receipt of federal and other funds to the agriculture community in the Commonwealth;

Promulgating administrative regulations relating to carrying out the purposes of KRS

248.701

to

248.727

;

Hiring an executive director to carry out the will of the board and who shall report solely to the Commissioner;

Ensuring the necessary mechanisms are in place for the committees created by KRS

248.715

to function effectively;

Contracting with other persons or entities if necessary to effectuate the board’s purposes and functions;

Enacting bylaws concerning the conduct of the board’s business and other administrative procedures as the board deems necessary;

Developing criteria to evaluate the success of the board’s programs and expenditures to applicants. The criteria shall be simple, easily measured, and easily understood. Criteria should include number of families farming, increases in farm income attributable to state programs, the number of diversified operations, and the number of different types of diversified efforts within a county, including the efforts that have failed;

Providing reports of each meeting, along with expenditures approved or denied, within thirty (30) days of the meeting, to the Tobacco Settlement Agreement Fund Oversight Committee created by KRS

248.723

. These reports shall contain detailed information relating to each expenditure by the board and detailed information on each application for funding a project or initiative by the board and decision by the board regarding each proposal, except information that may violate confidentiality. This information shall be provided by electronic format as prescribed by the Legislative Research Commission;

Submitting an annual written report to the Governor, the Commissioner of Agriculture, the Tobacco Settlement Agreement Fund Oversight Committee, and the Legislative Research Commission regarding the administrative, financial, and programmatic activities of the board; and

Making recommendations to the General Assembly through the Legislative Research Commission on possible adjustments to the funding formula for county allocations and the percent allocated to counties as provided in KRS

248.703

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 530, § 5, effective April 26, 2000; 2010, ch. 135, § 6, effective July 15, 2010; 2021 ch. 12, § 9, effective March 12, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(3/12/2021). Under the authority of KRS 7.136(1), the Reviser of Statutes has altered the format of the text in subsection (5) of this statute during codification. The words in the text were not changed.

248.711.
Criteria for application for state funds — Uses and restrictions on funds in counties account — Administration of agricultural development fund — Applicant’s right to appear before oversight committee.

Criteria to be used in considering applications for state funds shall include, but not be limited to:

Assistance to tobacco farmers and communities in counties most affected by the loss in tobacco income;

Assistance to communities most dependent on agriculture;

Enhancement and promotion of agriculture in the Commonwealth;

Merits of the proposal in the application;

Compatibility with state and local agriculture-related comprehensive plans;

Documentation of measures likely to ensure soundness of the proposal such as cash flow, security, market evaluation, and infrastructure considerations;

Promotion of diversification;

Regional orientation;

Cooperation among entities involved in the project and application process; and

Effect on the economic viability of family farms.

Uses and restrictions on the funds in the counties account shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Funds may be used for deferred, no-interest, or low-interest venture capital loans to enhance farms’ revenues by initiating:

Current farming techniques or practices improvements; or

New farming ventures on the farm;

Funds used for loans shall be administered through a duly licensed or chartered financial institution organized and regulated:

Under the laws of this state in accordance with KRS Chapter 286; or

Created by Congress and organized and regulated in accordance with provisions of federal law;

Terms of the loans may include a limit on deferral of payment of interest or principal to five (5) years, and a limit on the interest rates. Repaid loans and interest shall be credited to the appropriate county’s allocation within the counties account;

Funds may be used as grants for local agricultural economic development projects;

Funds may be used as grants for water line extension to farms or for a fifty percent (50%) match for water improvements on farms;

Funds may be used for programs to assist farmers in transitioning from one (1) type of farming to another or from farming to another vocation;

Local governments may apply for funds to clean up environmental problems created by a farm failure where there is no reasonable prospect that the problem will be cleaned up by a private individual or entity;

Eligibility for funds in this subsection shall require that:

Tobacco farmers be given priority;

Applicants have sufficient equity to assure a reasonable chance of success of the action proposed for funding;

Small farmers have as equal access to the funds as large farmers; and

Consideration be given to what percent of a county’s allocation of moneys an applicant is requesting; and

Counties may use their funds for multicounty or regional projects. They may also use their funds to maximize state or federal matching fund programs.

In administering the fund under KRS 248.709(1), the board shall be governed by the following principles:

Individuals, groups, educational institutions, governmental entities, cooperatives, including limited cooperative associations, and other agriculturally related entities are eligible to receive moneys from the fund; and

The board shall receive five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for administrative costs in fiscal year 2001 and six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) in fiscal year 2002. These amounts shall include any costs necessary to offset administrative expenses incurred by the county cooperative extension service offices for providing administrative support to the agricultural development councils as provided in KRS

248.721

.

If the state board recommends that an application not be approved or that it be changed, the applicant may take the application before the oversight subcommittee created in KRS

248.723

for discussion and possible resolution of differences.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 530, § 6, effective April 26, 2000; 2012, ch. 160, § 138, effective July 12, 2012.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/12/2006).
2006 Ky. Acts ch. 247 instructs the Reviser of Statutes to adjust KRS references throughout the statutes to conform with the 2006 renumbering of the Financial Services Code, KRS Chapter 286. Such an adjustment has been made in this statute.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 21, (7) at 1646.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. X, C, 1, (1) at 1760.

248.713.
Use of county allocation funding.

Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS

248.655

, county allocations may be used for projects before the completion of a comprehensive plan or strategic plan as determined by the board or if they fall under the conditions described in KRS 248.709(5)(b) or (c) or meet the criteria in KRS 248.711(2).

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 530, § 7, effective April 26, 2000; 2021 ch. 12, § 10, effective March 12, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(3/12/2021). Under the authority of KRS 7.136(1), the Reviser of Statutes has changed a reference in this statute to reflect the reformatting of KRS 248.709(5) during codification. No words were changed in the text of either section.

248.715.
Committees of board.

The board shall create committees, including, but not limited to:

Access to Capital Committee;

Environmental Cost Share Committee;

Marketing and Entrepreneurship Committee;

Technology, Infrastructure, and Training Committee;

Farmland Preservation Committee; and

Technical Issues Advisory Committee.

Each committee shall be composed of board members knowledgeable about the programs being overseen by that committee.

The committees shall assist the board in developing programs and criteria for programs to be considered by the board and may utilize nonboard members with expertise in the jurisdictional area of the committee for assistance. The committees shall make recommendations to the board, and the board shall determine which programs are to be overseen and implemented by the committees. The board shall determine which individual projects in each program are approved.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 530, § 8, effective April 26, 2000.

248.717.
Creation and implementation of board’s programs.

Programs that shall be created by the board and overseen and implemented by the board or committees include:

Programs that receive direct funding from the board:

A Farm Market Development and Infrastructure Program to develop regional, integrated farm markets, and regional or community capital projects. The board may authorize moneys to the Department of Agriculture for each year of the biennium to be used for agriculture market development and infrastructure; and

An Agricultural Entrepreneurship Program overseen by the board to support small farm agricultural diversification through technical assistance, business mentoring, and financial incentives.

Programs that receive direct authorization for moneys from the agricultural development fund by the General Assembly may include, but not be limited to:

An Environmental Stewardship Program to provide cost-share assistance to farmland owners for compliance with the state agriculture water quality plan and other environmental compliance requirements; and

A Rural Water Line Extension Program to provide municipal water in areas of high agricultural activity or need. Priority shall be given to the tobacco-impacted communities most adversely affected by tobacco losses. The General Assembly shall authorize the issuance of bonds through the Kentucky Infrastructure Authority for this program.

The board may create and fund other agricultural assistance programs in addition to those created under subsection (1) of this section, including an environmental cleanup program for cost-share assistance to tobacco warehouse operators for demolition and abatement of environmental hazards associated with tobacco warehouse structures.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 530, § 9, effective April 26, 2000.

248.719.
Center for Entrepreneurship.

The board is authorized to establish a Center for Entrepreneurship to operate under the Agricultural Entrepreneurship Program provided in KRS 248.717(1)(b). The duties of the center shall include:

Primarily identifying and coordinating with existing agencies in order to develop and deliver entrepreneurial assistance. The center shall be primarily a clearinghouse requiring little or no capital construction;

Assisting local individuals and entities and regional and statewide entities in developing and carrying out entrepreneurial efforts relating to agriculture; and

Advising the Agricultural Development Board on the fiscal soundness and other aspects of entrepreneurial proposals.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 530, § 10, effective April 26, 2000.

248.721.
County agricultural development councils.

Each county shall establish an agricultural development council to evaluate the needs of the local agricultural economy and to devise a plan for the county that would identify programs best suited for the agricultural development of the county. The council shall assist prospective applicants in the council’s county in obtaining moneys from the agricultural development fund. Each council shall consist of nine (9) members as follows:

Two (2) farmers selected by the Farm Service Agency county committee;

Two (2) members selected by the board or boards of the soil conservation district or districts serving the county;

Two (2) members selected by the county extension council, one (1) of whom shall have experience in agricultural diversification; and

Three (3) at-large members with farm experience and familiarity with the county’s agricultural development opportunities and processes selected by the six (6) members in paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subsection.

No less than two (2) of the nine (9) members appointed to the county agricultural development council under subsection (1) of this section shall be young farmers between the ages of twenty-one (21) and forty (40).

At least one (1) of the nine (9) members appointed to the county agricultural development council under subsection (1) of this section shall represent a gender or race that is not represented on the council at the time of the selection.

On July 1, 2002, and every two (2) years thereafter, members shall be appointed for two (2) year terms. Beginning on July 1, 2010, persons appointed to serve on county agricultural development councils shall be limited to two (2) consecutive two (2) year terms, but shall be eligible for appointment to additional consecutive terms after being absent from a council for a period of two (2) years between each cycle of consecutive terms.

Any vacancy occurring on a county agricultural development council before the expiration of the vacating member’s term shall be filled within sixty (60) days by the authority or members making the original appointment, in the same manner as the original appointment was made under subsection (1) of this section.

Each council shall be attached to the county cooperative extension service for administrative support.

Each council shall receive guidance and assistance from the board as the council devises plans and assists applicants as provided in subsection (1) of this section.

Councils shall make applicants aware of criteria for projects set out in KRS

248.711

.

Councils shall be responsible for developing local strategies for enhancing agricultural opportunities and assisting local farmers.

Each council shall utilize the resources of the Agricultural Entrepreneurship Program created in KRS

248.717

, the Kentucky Small Business Development Center Network, and the Kentucky Department of Agriculture for assistance and support in aiding prospective applicants in obtaining moneys from the fund.

Each county council shall provide its plan to the board. If the state board recommends changes in the county plan that the council does not agree with, the council may take the plan before the subcommittee created in KRS

248.723

for discussion and possible resolution of differences.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 530, § 11, effective April 26, 2000; 2009, ch. 36, § 1, effective June 25, 2009.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(11/24/2009).
2009 Ky. Acts ch. 27, sec. 2, provides:

248.723.
Tobacco Settlement Agreement Fund Oversight Committee — Membership — Meetings — Vote required to act — Reporting of expenditure under early childhood development fund and the Kentucky health care improvement fund.

There is created a permanent subcommittee of the Legislative Research Commission to be known as the Tobacco Settlement Agreement Fund Oversight Committee. The subcommittee shall be composed of twelve (12) members and shall include four (4) members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker; two (2) members of the minority party in the House of Representatives appointed by the Minority Floor Leader; four (4) members of the Senate appointed by the President; and two (2) members of the minority party in the Senate appointed by the Minority Floor Leader. The members of the subcommittee shall serve for terms of two (2) years. The appointed members from each chamber shall elect one (1) member from their chamber to serve as co-chair. Any vacancy that may occur in the membership of the subcommittee shall be filled pursuant to this subsection by the same appointing authority who made the original appointment.

The co-chairs shall have joint responsibilities for committee meeting agendas and presiding at committee meetings. The members of the subcommittee shall be compensated for attending meetings as provided in KRS 7.090(3) and 7.110(5).

A majority of the entire membership of the Tobacco Settlement Agreement Fund Oversight Committee shall constitute a quorum, and all actions of the subcommittee shall be by vote of a majority of its entire membership.

Any professional, clerical, or other employees required by the subcommittee shall be provided in accordance with KRS 7.090(4) and (5).

Subsections (6) to (10) of this section shall apply only to the expenditures from and projects under the agricultural development fund;

Subsection (11) shall apply to all expenditures under the tobacco settlement agreement fund created in KRS

248.654

; and

Subsection (12) shall apply to expenditures from the early childhood development fund and the Kentucky health care improvement fund created in KRS

200.151

and

194A.055

.

The subcommittee shall review each project being submitted to the Agricultural Development Board. In reviewing the projects, the subcommittee shall determine whether the criteria or requirements required by KRS

248.701

to

248.727

have been met and whether any other relevant requirements have been met.

If the subcommittee determines that any of the criteria or requirements required by KRS

248.701

to

248.727

, except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, have not been met, the subcommittee may, by majority vote, recommend to the board in writing that a project not be approved.

If the subcommittee determines that all relevant criteria were met for proposals not approved by the board, the subcommittee may, by majority vote, recommend to the board in writing that the project be approved.

The reasons for recommending that a project be approved or not approved shall be stated in correspondence from the subcommittee, which shall be issued within thirty (30) days of action of the subcommittee.

If the board proceeds with approval of a project under the agricultural development fund that the subcommittee has recommended in writing not be approved, or refuses to approve a project that the subcommittee has recommended in writing be approved, the board shall provide a written explanation to the subcommittee as to why the board took that action on the project. The written explanation shall be sent within thirty (30) days of receiving the subcommittee’s notification.

The subcommittee shall also hear cases that arise under KRS 248.721(9) and 248.711(4). In these cases the subcommittee shall provide a forum for discussion and possible resolution of differences between the board and the affected party. If the differences are not resolved, the subcommittee may, by majority vote, recommend to the board in writing a course of action.

The subcommittee shall maintain records of its findings and determinations. The records shall be transmitted to the appropriate interim joint committees of the Legislative Research Commission within thirty (30) days of making any determination.

The subcommittee shall issue an annual written report to the Legislative Research Commission regarding the findings of the subcommittee.

All expenditures under the early childhood development fund and the Kentucky health care improvement fund created in KRS

200.151

and

194A.055

shall be reported to the subcommittee. The expenditures shall be submitted in an electronic format in a manner approved by the Legislative Research Commission in order for the Commission to have a repository of information in Master Settlement Agreement funding expenditures.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 530, § 12, effective April 26, 2000; 2003, ch. 185, § 7, effective March 31, 2003; 2009, ch. 36, § 3, effective June 25, 2009.

248.725.
Technical assistance provided by Kentucky Department of Agriculture.

The Kentucky Department of Agriculture may provide technical assistance to local individuals and entities, county agricultural development councils, and regional entities in developing proposals and in implementing proposals approved by the Agricultural Development Board.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 530, § 13, effective April 26, 2000; 2014, ch. 71, § 11, effective July 15, 2014.

248.727.
Responsibilities of agencies and educational institutions receiving agriculturally related funding.

Those agencies and educational institutions that receive agriculturally related funding under the provisions of KRS

248.701

to

248.727

, and those that receive state funding relating to assisting agriculture and farmers in this state shall devote efforts to revitalization and diversification of tobacco farms.

Each agency or institution in subsection (1) of this section shall issue a semiannual report on the details of the efforts it is carrying out to revitalize and diversify tobacco farms. The report shall include details of successes that have been achieved and shall be provided to the subcommittee created in KRS

248.723

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 530, § 14, effective April 26, 2000.